test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VW_waawaatesi_gt-glossing.yaml
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: waawaateswishbaniing
     waawaatesi+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: waawaateswishbaniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nwaawaatesiinymish
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nwaawaatesiinsmish
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gwaawaatesiinymish
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gwaawaatesiinsmish
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: waawaatesiinymish
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: waawaatesiinsmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyminaa
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsminaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyminaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymiwaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsminaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmiwaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4: waawaatesiinymini
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4: waawaatesiinsmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: nwaawaatesiinymiba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinymidig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: nwaawaatesiinsmiba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsmidig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: gwaawaatesiinymiba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymidig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: gwaawaatesiinsmiba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmidig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Prt: waawaatesiinymiba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinymidig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Prt: waawaatesiinsmiba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinsmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: nwaawaatesiinyman
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: nwaawaatesiinyming
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: nwaawaatesiinymag
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: nwaawaatesiinsman
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsming
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsmag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: gwaawaatesiinyman
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: gwaawaatesiinyming
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: gwaawaatesiinymag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: gwaawaatesiinsman
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsming
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsmag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: waawaatesiinyman
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: waawaatesiinyming
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: waawaatesiinsman
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: waawaatesiinsming
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+4: waawaatesiinyman
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Loc: waawaatesiinyming
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pl: waawaatesiinymag
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+4: waawaatesiinsman
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Loc: waawaatesiinsming
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pl: waawaatesiinsmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyshinaa
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsshinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshiwaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshiwaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+3+4: waawaatesiinyshini
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4: waawaatesiinsshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: nwaawaatesiinyshiba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyshidig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: nwaawaatesiinsshiba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsshidig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: gwaawaatesiinyshiba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshidig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: gwaawaatesiinsshiba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshidig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: waawaatesiinyshiba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinyshidig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: waawaatesiinsshiba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+4: nwaawaatesiinyshan
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: nwaawaatesiinyshing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: nwaawaatesiinyshag
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+4: nwaawaatesiinsshan
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsshing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsshag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+4: gwaawaatesiinyshan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: gwaawaatesiinyshing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: gwaawaatesiinyshag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+4: gwaawaatesiinsshan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsshing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsshag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+4: waawaatesiinyshan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiinyshing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waawaatesiinsshan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiinsshing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+4: waawaatesiinyshan
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiinyshing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiinyshag
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waawaatesiinsshan
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiinsshing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiinsshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiinynaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinynaandig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiinsnaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinynaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinynaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinywaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinywaadig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinsnaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiinswaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiinswaadig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiinyniwba
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiinsniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiinynaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiinynaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiinynaanig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiinsnaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsnaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinynaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinynaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinynaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinywaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinywaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinywaag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinsnaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsnaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiinswaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiinswaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiinswaag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiinywaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinywaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+3+4+4: waawaatesiinyniwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiinyniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiinswaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiinswaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+3+4+4: waawaatesiinsniwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiinsniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinybaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinybaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinybaniig
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiinsbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiinsbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiinsbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinybaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinybaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinybaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiinsbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiinsbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiinsbaniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+4: waawaatesiinybaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinybaniing
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsbaniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+4: waawaatesiinybaniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinybaniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinybaniig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+4: waawaatesiinsbaniin
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiinsbaniing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: waawaatesiinsbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshinaa
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshiwaa
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: waawaatesiimshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nwaawaatesiimshiba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshidig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gwaawaatesiimshiba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshidig
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: waawaatesiimshiba
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: waawaatesiimshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: nwaawaatesiimshan
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nwaawaatesiimshing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nwaawaatesiimshag
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: gwaawaatesiimshan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gwaawaatesiimshing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gwaawaatesiimshag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: waawaatesiimshan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiimshing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+4: waawaatesiimshan
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: waawaatesiimshing
     X+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: waawaatesiimshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nwaawaatesiimnaanba
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaawaatesiimnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiimnaanba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiimnaandig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gwaawaatesiimwaaba
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaawaatesiimwaadig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: waawaatesiimniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nwaawaatesiimnaanin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nwaawaatesiimnaaning
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nwaawaatesiimnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiimnaanin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiimnaaning
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiimnaanig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gwaawaatesiimwaan
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gwaawaatesiimwaang
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gwaawaatesiimwaag
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: waawaatesiimwaan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: waawaatesiimwaang
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+3+4+4: waawaatesiimniwan
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: waawaatesiimniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: nwaawaatesiimbaniin
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nwaawaatesiimbaniing
     1+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nwaawaatesiimbaniig
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: gwaawaatesiimbaniin
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gwaawaatesiimbaniing
     2+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gwaawaatesiimbaniig
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+4: waawaatesiimbaniin
     3+waawaatesi+NA+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: waawaatesiimbaniing
